Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.14.090

Election method—Ordinance providing for annexation, assumption of indebtedness.

Upon filing of the certified copy of the finding of the county legislative authority, the clerk shall transmit it to the legislative body of the city at the next regular meeting or as soon thereafter as practicable. If only a proposition relating to annexation or to annexation and adoption of a proposed zoning regulation was submitted to the voters and such proposition was approved, the legislative body shall adopt an ordinance providing for the annexation or adopt ordinances providing for the annexation and adoption of a proposed zoning regulation, as the case may be. If a proposition for annexation or for annexation and adoption of a proposed zoning regulation, and a proposition for assumption of all or any portion of indebtedness were both submitted, and both were approved, the legislative body shall adopt an ordinance providing for the annexation or for annexation and adoption of the proposed zoning regulation, including the assumption of the portion of indebtedness that was approved by the voters. If both propositions were submitted and only the annexation or the annexation and adoption of the proposed zoning regulation was approved, the legislative body may adopt an ordinance providing for the annexation or adopt ordinances providing for the annexation and adoption of the proposed zoning regulation, as the case may be, or the legislative body may refuse to annex when a proposal for assumption of the portion of indebtedness has been disapproved by the voters.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 124 s 6; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.14.090.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 124: See note following RCW 35A.14.015.